California statutes. Education Code
(a) The department shall provide an independent appeal procedure to each contracting agency providing preschool services pursuant to Section 8233 that shall be conducted by the Office of Administrative Hearings and shall be
 provided upon an appeal petition of the contracting agency in any of the following circumstances:

(1) Termination of a contracting agency’s contract.

(2) Denial of more than 4 percent or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), whichever is less, of a local contracting agency’s contracted payment for services schedule.

(3) Demand for remittance of an overpayment of more than 4 percent or twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), whichever is less, of a local contracting agency’s annual contract.

(b) Before filing an appeal petition for an action taken pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (a), the contracting agency shall have submitted all previously required standard monthly or quarterly reporting forms to the
 department.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8402 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 207.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8310.

All hearings required by Section 8309 shall be conducted according to the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), except as otherwise directed in this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8403 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 208.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8311.

The Office of Administrative Hearings shall, by June 30, 1982, adopt regulations governing the hearings, which shall include all of the following:

(a) Deadlines for filing petitions, commencing hearings and rendering decisions.

(b) Notice to affected parties.

(c) The manner for maintaining appropriate provision for electronic recording and transcription, if necessary.

(d) Hearings shall be conducted at the offices of the Office of Administrative Hearings in Sacramento or Los Angeles. However, hearings in Los Angeles shall be available only to local contracting agencies with the department whose annual contracts total less than two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(e) Any other issues deemed appropriate by the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8404 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 209.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8312.

The determination of the hearing examiner shall be the final administrative determination to be afforded the local contracting agency.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8405 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 210.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8313.

All actions by the department, as defined in subdivisions (a) to (c), inclusive, of Section 8309 shall be preceded by a written notice of action to the local contracting agency which shall include the
 following:

(a) A statement of the specific reasons for the action in the Statement of Issues.

(b) A description of the local contracting agency’s rights and responsibilities concerning the appeal procedure described herein.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8406 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 211.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8314.

(a) The Superintendent shall establish a contract classification system for purposes of identifying, monitoring, and providing technical assistance to contractors as follows:

(1) Clear contract.This designation shall be given to a contract that is neither a provisional contract, as described in paragraph (2), nor a conditional contract, as described in paragraph (3).

(2) Provisional contract.This designation applies to an agency’s first contract for any
 particular service or to the contract of an existing contracting agency for a new, modified, or different type of service. The timeframe of a provisional contract is at the discretion of the department and is given to ensure that the contracting agency can demonstrate fiscal and programmatic compliance before the contract is designated as a clear contract. The contract status shall be reviewed annually.

(3) Conditional contract.This designation applies to a high-risk contract awarded to a contracting agency that evidences fiscal or programmatic noncompliance, or both fiscal and programmatic noncompliance. A contracting agency with one or more contracts designated as conditional is deemed to be on conditional status with the department for all
 preschool program purposes and is subject to any restrictions deemed reasonable to secure compliance. The conditional contract shall include a bill of particulars detailing the items of noncompliance, the standards that must be met to avoid termination of contract and to qualify the agency for clear contract status, and technical assistance plan. Failure to demonstrate substantive progress toward fiscal or program compliance within six months of that designation shall constitute a breach of contract and may subject the contract to termination for any applicable cause specified in Section 8315 or 8317, in accordance with Section
 8309.

(b) Agencies with conditional contracts shall receive technical assistance from the department.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), technical assistance shall be provided to any contracting agency making a written request to its assigned consultant or administrator within 60 days of receipt of the request.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8406.6 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 212.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8315.

(a) A contracting agency that evidences any of the following acts or omissions may have its contract or contracts immediately terminated if there is documented evidence of the acts or omissions, and upon review and recommendation of the general counsel of the department:

(1) Fraud, or conspiracy to defraud.

(2) Misuse or misappropriation of state or federal funds, including a violation of Section
 8316.

(3) Embezzlement.

(4) Threats of bodily or other harm to a state official.

(5) Bribery or attempted bribery of a state official.

(6) Unsafe or unhealthy physical environment or facility.

(7) Substantiated abuse or molestation of children.

(8) Failure to report suspected child abuse or molestation.

(9) Theft of supplies, equipment, or food.

(10) Cessation of operations without the permission of the department, or acts or omissions evidencing
 abandonment of the contract or contracts.

(11) Failure of a program operating pursuant to this chapter to pay salaries owed to employees, pay federal payroll tax, or
 fully reimburse a significant number of childcare providers, as determined by the department, for more than 15 days after the employee salaries, federal payroll taxes, or reimbursement payments were due, unless the failure is attributable to a delay in receiving apportionments from the state.

(b) An agency whose contract is immediately terminated pursuant to this section retains appeal rights in accordance with Section
 8309.

(c) Notwithstanding any service provision in the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code), a notice of immediate termination shall be served on the contracting agency by personal service or at the last address on file with the department, by overnight mail or certified mail. Service may be proved in the manner authorized in a civil action. Service by mail is complete at the time of deposit.

(d) The department shall advise childcare and development contractors of the provisions of this section within 30 working days of the effective date of the
 act amending this section during the 2013–14 Regular Session of the Legislature.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8406.7 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 213.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8316.

(a) An agency that has in place or places a person in a position of fiscal responsibility or control who has been convicted of a crime involving misuse or misappropriation of state or federal funds, or a state or federal crime involving moral turpitude, may have its contract immediately terminated pursuant to Section 8315 if there is documented evidence of the conviction, and upon review and recommendation of the general counsel of the
 department.

(b) For purposes of this section, “position of fiscal responsibility or control” includes any authority to direct or control expenditure of, or any access to, state or federal preschool funds received pursuant to this chapter whether that authority or access is conferred based on the person’s status as an employee, director, manager, board member, or volunteer, or based on any other status.

(c) If the agency provides evidence to the department, before the effective date given in the notice of immediate termination, that the convicted person has been removed from the position of fiscal responsibility or control and provides assurance that the person will
 not be returned to a position of fiscal responsibility or control, the department shall withdraw the termination action.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8406.9 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 214.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8317.

Except for causes listed in Sections 8315 and 8316, termination of a California state preschool program contract shall not occur without good cause and without notice as described in Section
 8313
 at least 90 days before the effective date given in the notice of termination.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8407 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 215.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8318.

Actions as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 8309 shall remain in effect during the appeal process. However, local contracting agencies may continue to operate under the contract during an appeal of termination, unless the action is an immediate termination action taken pursuant to Section
 8315 or 8316, in which case a contracting agency shall not continue to operate under the contract after the effective date given in the notice of immediate termination.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8408 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 216.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

8319.

All contracts entered into by the department pursuant to Section 8233 shall contain a complete description of the appeal procedures provided in this article.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 8409 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 116, Sec. 217.   (AB 131)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.1. California Universal Preschool Planning Grant Program [8320. - 8320.]

8320.

(a) The California Universal Preschool Planning Grant Program is hereby established with the goal of expanding access universally to preschool programs for three- and four-year-old children across the state through a mixed-delivery system.

(b) As used in this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Children with exceptional needs” has the same meaning as defined in Section 8205.

(2) “Mixed-delivery system” means a system of early childhood education services that is delivered through a variety of providers, programs, and settings, including Head Start agencies or delegate agencies funded under the Head Start Act (42 U.S.C.
 Sec. 9831, et seq.), public, private, or proprietary agencies, including community-based organizations, public schools, and local educational agencies that offer center-based childcare and preschool programs, tribal childcare and preschool, and family childcare through a family childcare home education network.

(3) “Three- and four-year-old children” has the same meaning as “three-year-old children” and “four-year-old children,” as those terms are defined in Section 8205.

(4) “Universal preschool” means those programs that offer part-day or full-day, or both, educational programs for three- and four-year-old children, and may be offered through a mixed-delivery system.

(c) (1) (A) Pursuant to an appropriation in the annual Budget Act, for each of the 2022–23, 2023–24, and
 2024–25 fiscal years, the Superintendent shall consult with the Director of Social Services and shall create an application to award grant funds to one designated lead agency within each county, as set forth in this section. Each county shall submit a single planning grant application.

(B) The county grant submission shall contain a signed agreement from the resource and referral agencies in the county and the local planning council.

(2) (A) (i) A local planning council established pursuant to Article 2 (commencing with Section 10485) of Chapter 31 of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall have first priority for grant awards from their county’s allocation of funds calculated for each county, as described paragraph (1) of subdivision (d).

(ii) A
 local planning council shall express interest by submitting a letter of intent to the department on a template developed by the Superintendent in consultation with the State Department of Social Services.

(iii) If a local planning council wishes to partner with other counties in their region pursuant to subdivision (j), the local planning council shall indicate this intent in their letter of intent.

(B) (i) In counties where the local planning council does not submit a letter of intent to receive an award, a resource and referral agency established pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10217) of Part 1.8 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code that operates in the county may submit a joint letter of intent with the local planning council to the Superintendent, on a template developed by the Superintendent in consultation with the State
 Department of Social Services, indicating interest in conducting the activities of this grant in their county.

(ii) The joint letter submitted pursuant to clause (i) shall designate a lead fiscal agency and describe the partnership the resource and referral agencies will use to meet the requirements of the grant.

(iii) If a resource and referral agency wishes to partner with other counties in their region pursuant to subdivision (j), the resource and referral agency shall indicate this intent in their letter of intent.

(C) Once letters of intent have been submitted, the Superintendent shall require the designated lead agency from each county to submit an application that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following information:

(i) A
 description of how it will allocate funds and achieve tasks described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(ii) A description of how the applicant will partner with the county office of education and other local educational agencies in the county on the work required pursuant to Section
 8281.5 to ensure activities conducted under this grant meet community needs for universal preschool in a mixed-delivery system not already addressed.

(D) All grantees shall be required to coordinate with the county office of education on the work required pursuant to Section 8281.5. In counties where the county office of education operates the resource and referral agency or the local planning council, the staff responsible for those activities at the county office of education shall be included and financially supported to participate in the activities of this grant.

(E) The grantee shall form a single working group that shall include, but not be limited to, representatives from the county offices of education, school districts, charter schools offering transitional kindergarten, resource and referral programs, alternative payment
 programs operating preschool programs, First 5 county commissions, contracted state preschool programs, including both local educational agency and community-based organization programs, general childcare programs serving preschool-age children, tribal preschool programs, private center-based childcare preschool providers, licensed family childcare providers, educators, exclusive bargaining representatives, Head Start, faculty at local institutions of higher education focusing on child development or early childhood education, and early childhood education teacher preparation programs, including institutions of higher education.

(d) The Superintendent shall develop and administer a grant process and award grant funds to each county that applies for funding for the 2022–23 fiscal year if the application conforms with the requirements of this section. Funds shall be allocated using a methodology for determining the amount of funds in each county
 that accounts for all of the following:

(1) (A) Base grant funding that reflects the number of three- and four-year-old children in the county or region.

(B) Add-on funding that reflects both of the following:

(i) The number of three- and four-year-old children in the county or region who are currently eligible for, but not enrolled in, subsidized preschool programs as part of the mixed-delivery system for universal preschool, as determined by the Superintendent.

(ii) The number of three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs in the county or region.

(2) To the extent funds are available in the Budget Act of 2023, existing grantees shall be eligible to
 apply for a renewal grant subject to terms and conditions developed by the Superintendent.

(3) (A) To the extent funds are available in the Budget Act of 2024, the following entities shall be eligible to apply for a grant subject to terms and conditions developed by the Superintendent:

(i) Existing grantees.

(ii) Newly formed consortia.

(iii) Individual counties that participated in a former consortium for this grant, with the first priority for the funds going to the local planning council, pursuant to the process described in subdivision (c), as appropriate.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), in a county that previously received funds from this grant, where the
 previous grantee or consortia of grantees does not intend to reapply for funding pursuant to subparagraph (A), the following entities shall be eligible to apply as part of an existing or newly formed consortia, with the following priority order:

(i) The local planning council.

(ii) Resource and referral agencies.

(iii) First 5 county commissions.

(C) If an entity applies for the grant pursuant to subparagraph (B), the grant submission shall include a signed statement, from all entities within the county with a higher priority and within the same priority, that acknowledges their intent not to apply for the funds.

(D) An entity receiving funds pursuant to this paragraph shall complete all
 activities of the grant pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), subparagraph (E) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c), and paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (e).

(E) The entity applying for funds in each county pursuant to this paragraph shall express interest by submitting a letter of intent to the department on a template developed by the Superintendent, before submitting the request for data.

(F) Each county shall submit a single planning grant application for the relevant fiscal year.

(G) If funds are awarded pursuant to this paragraph to a First 5 county commission, the First 5 county commission shall collaborate with, and subgrant funds, where appropriate, to local planning councils and resource and referral agencies to implement the activities of this section.

(4) (A) (i) For the 2026–27 fiscal year, the sum of fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for allocation to one designated lead agency within each county that is a local educational agency pursuant to subparagraphs (B) to (D), inclusive. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2032.

(ii) A county office of education shall have first priority for grant awards from their county’s allocation of funds calculated for each county, as described in paragraph (1).

(B) (i) A county office of education shall express interest by submitting a letter of intent to the department on a template developed by the department.

(ii) If a county office of education wishes to partner with other counties in their region pursuant to subdivision (j), the county office of education shall indicate this intent in their letter of intent.

(iii) The letter of intent shall include signatures from the local planning council and resource and referral agencies in the county or region acknowledging the county office of education’s intent to apply.

(C) (i) In counties where the county office of education does not submit a letter of intent to receive an award, a school district or charter school that operates in the county may submit a joint letter of intent with the county office of education to the department, on a template developed by the department, indicating interest in conducting the activities of this grant in their county.

(ii) If the school district or charter school wishes to partner with other counties in their region pursuant to subdivision (j), the school district or charter school shall indicate this intent in their letter
 of intent.

(iii) The letter of intent shall include signatures from the local planning council and resource and referral agencies in the county or region acknowledging the school district’s or charter school’s intent to apply.

(D) Once letters of intent have been submitted, the department shall require the designated lead agency from each county to submit an application that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(i) A description of how it will allocate funds and achieve tasks described in subdivision (f).

(ii) A description of how the applicant will partner with the local planning council, resource and referral agency, and other local educational agencies in the county on the work required pursuant to Section 8281.5 to ensure
 activities conducted under this grant meet community needs for universal preschool in a mixed-delivery system not already addressed.

(iii) (I) For a designated lead agency that was a prior grantee pursuant to the allocations in subdivision (c), information on how the lead agency intends to build on previous efforts.

(II) For a designated lead agency that was not a prior grantee pursuant to the allocations in subdivision (c), information on how the lead agency will build on previous efforts of the prior grantee and include the prior grantee in the work moving forward, as appropriate.

(iv) Signatures from the local planning council and resource and referral agencies in the county or region supporting the application and the activities listed in the application.

(E) All grantees shall be required to coordinate with the county office of education on the work required pursuant to Section 8281.5. In counties where the county office of education operates the resource and referral agency or the local planning council, the staff responsible for those activities at the county office of education shall be included and financially supported to participate in the activities of this grant.

(F) All grantees shall be required to identify funds within their county or region, or both, for a one-to-one funding match.

(e) (1) Grant funds issued pursuant to
 paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (d) may be used for costs associated with any of the following:

(A) Assessing the parental preferences and the need for access to available high-quality universal preschool through a mixed-delivery system for three- and four-year-old children in the county or region by program type.

(B) Establishing or strengthening partnerships with other providers of early childhood education services and family childcare home education networks within the county or region’s mixed-delivery system and with tribal partners, to ensure that high-quality options for universal preschool, including inclusive preschool programs and multilingual programs, are available for three- and four-year-old children.

(C) Engaging in community-level coordination and planning with agencies participating in the county or region’s mixed-delivery system to implement high-quality universal preschool options.

(D) Coordinating with special education local and regional partners, including regional centers and local educational agencies, to ensure three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs in the county or region have access to universal preschool through the mixed-delivery system in the least restrictive environment in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(E) Partnering with the regional agency responsible for the system described in Section 8203.1 to fund
 and support workforce development, coaching, and other quality improvement activities to support the universal preschool mixed-delivery system.

(F) Other costs, as specified by the Superintendent.

(2) Entities receiving grants pursuant to
 paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (d) shall do all of the following:

(A) Plan for the provision of high-quality universal preschool options for three- and four-year-old children, through a mixed-delivery system that ensures access to high-quality full- and part-day learning experiences, coordinated services, and referrals for families to access health and social-emotional support services. Indicators of quality shall be determined by the Superintendent pursuant to Section 8203.

(B) Plan for increasing inclusion of children with exceptional needs in universal preschool.

(C) Assist existing and aspiring universal preschool site supervisors, teachers, and other support staff in identifying and accessing local workforce pathway programs, including financial support programs, to increase the number of site supervisors, teachers, and other support staff who have required credentials and degrees.

(D) Provide outreach services and enrollment support for families of three- or four-year-old children, to meet family needs and provide those children with high-quality full- and part-day learning experiences.

(E) Partner to plan for, align and coordinate the plans, and conduct the activities described in
 subparagraphs (A) to (D), inclusive, with all local educational agencies in the county or region that received funding pursuant to the California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program (Article 13.2 (commencing with Section 8281.5)).

(F) Partner with tribes to reflect family and tribal community needs, as sovereign nations, in the planning and implementation of the universal preschool mixed-delivery system.

(G) Commit to providing program data to the department, as specified by the Superintendent, including, but not limited to, plan development steps and participants engaged in the grant activities and planning, core needs of critical communities, including tribal communities, and recipient information and participation in overall program evaluation.

(H) Develop a plan for consideration by the county board of education at a public meeting on or before June 30, 2023, for how all four-year-old children and an
 increased number of at-promise three-year-old children in the county may access full-day learning programs before kindergarten that meet the needs of parents, including through partnerships with the universal preschool programs in the mixed-delivery system and expanded learning offerings.

(f) (1) Grant funds issued in the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) may be used for costs associated with any of the following:

(A) Assessing the parental preferences and the need for access to available high-quality universal preschool through a mixed-delivery system for three- and four-year-old children in the county or region by program type.

(B) Establishing or strengthening partnerships with other providers of early childhood education services and family childcare home education networks within the county or region’s mixed-delivery system and with tribal partners, to ensure that high-quality options for universal preschool, including inclusive preschool programs and multilingual programs, are available for three- and four-year-old children.

(C) Engaging in community-level coordination and planning with agencies participating in the county or region’s mixed-delivery system to implement high-quality universal preschool options.

(D) Coordinating with special education local and regional partners, including regional centers and local educational agencies, to ensure three- and four-year-old children with exceptional needs in the county or region have access to
 universal preschool through the mixed-delivery system in the least restrictive environment in accordance with Section 1412(a)(5)(A) of Title 20 of the United States Code.

(E) Partnering with the regional agency responsible for the system described in Section 8203.1 to fund and support workforce development, coaching, and other quality improvement activities to support the universal preschool mixed-delivery system.

(F) Other costs, as specified by the department.

(2) Entities receiving grants issued in the 2026–27 fiscal year pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) shall do all of the following:

(A) Plan and coordinate countywide or
 regionwide, or both, for the provision of high-quality universal preschool options for three- and four-year-old children, through a mixed-delivery system that ensures access to high-quality full- and part-day learning experiences, coordinated services, and referrals for families to access health and social-emotional support services. Indicators of quality shall be determined by the department pursuant to Section 8203.

(B) Plan and coordinate countywide or regionwide, or both, for the increased inclusion of children with exceptional needs in universal preschool.

(C) Assist existing and aspiring universal preschool site supervisors, teachers, and other support staff in identifying and accessing local workforce pathway programs, including financial support programs, to increase the number of site supervisors, teachers, and other support staff who have required credentials and
 degrees.

(D) Provide outreach services and enrollment support for families of three- or four-year-old children to meet family needs and provide those children with high-quality full- and part-day learning experiences.

(E) Coordinate grant efforts with efforts underway by local educational agencies in the county or region that received funding pursuant to the California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program (Article 13.2 (commencing with Section 8281.5)).

(F) Partner with tribes to reflect family and tribal community needs, as sovereign nations, in the planning and implementation of the universal preschool mixed-delivery system.

(G) Commit to providing program data to the department, as specified by the department, including, but not
 limited to, plan development and implementation steps, participants engaged in the grant activities and planning, core needs of critical communities and families, including tribal communities, and recipient information and participation in overall program evaluation.

(g) (1) If the entity receiving the grant in a county is a local planning council, the local planning council shall collaborate with, and subgrant funds where appropriate to, local resource and referral agencies to implement the activities of this section.

(2) If the entity receiving the grant in a county is a resource and referral agency, the resource and referral agency shall collaborate with, and subgrant funds where appropriate to, the local planning council to implement the activities of this section.

(h) If the entity receiving a grant in a county pursuant to the allocation in paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) is a local educational agency that does not operate a resource and referral agency or the local planning council, the local educational agency shall collaborate with, and subgrant funds where appropriate to, the local planning council or the local resource and referral agencies, or both, to implement the activities of this section.

(i) (1) (A) Funds that are allocated or awarded pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (d) shall be expended on or before June 30,
 2028. Notwithstanding any other law, on June 30, 2029, any unexpended funds of the amount awarded for purposes of this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(B) The department shall initiate collection proceedings for grant funds used by grantees in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, failing to submit all required data pursuant to
 subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e).

(2) (A) Funds that are allocated or awarded pursuant to paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) shall be expended on or before June 30, 2032. Notwithstanding any other law, on June 30, 2033, any unexpended funds of the amount awarded for purposes of this subdivision shall revert to the General Fund.

(B) The department shall initiate collection proceedings for grant funds used by grantees in a manner inconsistent with the requirements of this section, including, but not limited to, failing to submit all required data pursuant to subparagraph (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (f).

(j) This section does not prohibit counties from joining together to address regional needs with their funding and developing regional plans.

(k) The Superintendent shall provide a report to the Department of Finance and the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the Legislature on or before October 1, 2033, on the expenditure of funds and relevant outcome data in order to evaluate the impact of the grants awarded under this section.

(l) For purposes of this section, the State Department of Education may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts with nongovernmental entities
 on a bid or negotiated basis. A contract entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, and Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(m) Notwithstanding any other law, a contracted nongovernmental entity described in subdivision (l) may subcontract as necessary in the performance of its duties, subject to approval of the Superintendent.

(n) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(o) For purposes of making the computations
 required by Section 8 of Article XVI of the California Constitution, the appropriation made by paragraph (4) of subdivision (d) shall be deemed to be “General Fund revenues appropriated for school districts,” as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year, and included within the “total allocations to school districts and community college districts from General Fund proceeds of taxes appropriated pursuant to Article XIIIB,” as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 41202, for the 2025–26 fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 250, Sec. 4.   (SB 133)   Effective September 18, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13.2. California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program [8281.5. - 8281.5.]

8281.5.

(a) The California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program is hereby established as a state early learning initiative with the goal of expanding access to developmentally appropriate classroom-based preschool and prekindergarten programs at local educational agencies.

(b) For the 2021–22 fiscal year, the sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund to the department for allocation to local educational agencies for the California Prekindergarten Planning and Implementation Grant Program pursuant to this section. These funds shall be available for encumbrance until June 30, 2024.

(c) (1) Of the total amount
 appropriated under subdivision (b), the department shall allocate two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in the 2021–22 fiscal year to local educational agencies as follows:

(A) A minimum base grant to all local educational agencies that operate kindergarten programs as determined using California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment from the 2020–21 certification, as follows:

(i) For local educational agencies with an enrollment of 1 to 23 pupils, inclusive, the minimum base grant shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(ii) For local educational agencies with an enrollment of 24 to 99 pupils, inclusive, the minimum base grant shall be fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).

(iii) For local educational
 agencies with an enrollment of 100 or more pupils, the minimum base grant shall be one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).

(B) A minimum base grant for each county office of education of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) for each local educational agency in their county that operates kindergarten programs to support countywide planning and capacity building.

(C) Of the remaining funds after allocations under subparagraphs (A) and (B):

(i) Sixty percent shall be available as enrollment grants. These grants shall be allocated based on the local educational agency’s proportional share of total California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment for the 2019–20 fiscal year, as applied to the total amount of program funds available for the enrollment grant. For purposes of this clause,
 the total statewide kindergarten enrollment shall be calculated using the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment minus the transitional kindergarten program enrollment for the 2019–20 fiscal year for each local educational agency.

(ii) Forty percent shall be available as supplemental grants. These grants shall be allocated based on the local educational agency’s California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System Fall 1 kindergarten enrollment minus the transitional kindergarten program enrollment for the 2019–20 fiscal year, multiplied by the local educational agency’s unduplicated pupil percentage, as calculated pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 42238.02 or subdivision (b) of Section 2574 certified as of the second principal apportionment. Funds for this purpose shall be distributed percent-to-total from funds available for the supplemental grant.

(D) Notwithstanding any other law, any kindergarten enrollment reported by a county office of education shall be attributed to the school district of geographic residence.

(2) Grant funds may be used for costs associated with creating or expanding California state preschool programs or transitional kindergarten programs, or to establish or strengthen partnerships with other providers of prekindergarten education within the local educational agency, including Head Start programs, to ensure that high-quality options for prekindergarten education are available for four-year-old children. Allowable costs include, but are not necessarily limited to, planning costs, hiring and recruitment costs, staff training and professional development, classroom materials, and supplies.
